de: Beleuchtungsmodus: Blinkend; Fade; Schnelles Blinken; Aufblitzen; Aus; Pulsierend; SOS; Langsames Blinken; Dauerlicht; Stroboskop; Sonstige
pl: Modeoświetlenia: Miganie; Zanikanie; Szybkie miganie; Rozbłysk; Wyłączone; Pulsowanie; SOS; Powolne miganie; Ciągłe; Stroboskop; Inne
da: Lystilstand: Blink; Fade; Hurtigt blink; Blitz; Slukket; Puls; SOS; Langsomt blink; Konstant; Stroboskop; Andet
nl: Verlichting modus: Knipperen; Vervagen; Snel flitsen; Flitsen; Uit; Pulseren; SOS; Langzaam flitsen; Continu; Stroboscoop; Overige
nb: Lysmodus: Blink; Fade; Raskt blink; Blink; Av; Pulserende; SOS; Langsomt blink; Fast lys; Strobe; Annet
pt-BR: Iluminação modo: Piscante; Esmaecimento; Flash rápido; Flash; Desligado; Pulsante; SOS; Flash lento; Fixa; Estrobo; Outro
fr: Mode d’éclairage: Clignotant; Fondu; Clignotement rapide; Flash; Désactivé; Pulsation; SOS; Clignotement lent; Fixe; Stroboscope; Autre
zh-TW: 照明模式: 閃爍; 淡入淡出; 快閃; 閃光; 關閉; 脈衝; SOS; 慢閃; 恆亮; 頻閃; 其他
pt-PT: Modo de iluminação: Piscar; Desvanecer; Piscar rápido; Flash; Desligado; Pulsar; SOS; Piscar lento; Contínuo; Estroboscópio; Outro
ru: Режим освещения: Мигание; Затухание; Быстрое мигание; Вспышка; Выкл.; Пульсация; SOS; Медленное мигание; Постоянный свет; Стробоскоп; Другое
it: Modalità di illuminazione: Lampeggiante; Dissolvenza; Lampeggio veloce; Flash; Spento; Pulsante; SOS; Lampeggio lento; Fisso; Stroboscopica; Altro
lt-LT: Apšvietimo režimas: Mirksėjimas; Blankimas; Greitas blyksėjimas; Blyksėjimas; Išjungta; Pulsavimas; SOS; Lėtas blyksėjimas; Tolygus; Stroboskopas; Kita
hr-HR: Način osvjetljenja: Treperenje; Prigušivanje; Brzo bljeskanje; Bljeskanje; Isključeno; Pulsiranje; SOS; Sporo bljeskanje; Stalno svjetlo; Stroboskop; Ostalo
ro-RO: Mod de iluminare: Intermitent; Estompare; Aprindere intermitentă rapidă; Flash; Oprit; Puls; SOS; Aprindere intermitentă lentă; Continuu; Stroboscop; Altele
th: โหมดการให้แสงสว่าง: กะพริบ; เฟด; กะพริบเร็ว; แฟลช; ปิด; เป็นจังหวะ; SOS; กะพริบช้า; สว่างค้าง; สโตรบ; อื่นๆ
sv: Belysningsläge: Blinkande; Toning; Snabbt blinkande; Blixtrande; Av; Pulserande; SOS; Långsamt blinkande; Fast sken; Stroboskop; Övrigt
es: Modo de iluminación: Parpadeo; Atenuación; Destello rápido; Destello; Apagado; Pulso; SOS; Destello lento; Fijo; Estroboscópico; Otro
bg-BG: Режим на осветление: Мигане; Постепенно избледняване; Бързо мигане; Светкавица; Изключен; Пулсиране; SOS; Бавно мигане; Непрекъсната светлина; Строб; Друго
ko: 조명 모드: 깜박임; 페이드; 빠르게 점멸; 점멸; 꺼짐; 펄스; SOS; 느리게 점멸; 켜짐 유지; 스트로브; 기타
vi: Chế độ chiếu sáng: Nháy chớp; Mờ dần; Nháy nhanh; Nháy sáng; Tắt; Nhịp đập; SOS; Nháy chậm; Sáng liên tục; Chớp liên hồi; Khác
cs: Režim osvětlení: Blikání; Prolínání; Rychlé blikání; Záblesky; Vypnuto; Pulzování; SOS; Pomalé blikání; Stálé svícení; Stroboskop; Jiné
el: Λειτουργία φωτισμού: Αναβόσβημα; Σταδιακό σβήσιμο; Γρήγορο αναβόσβημα; Φλας; Ανενεργό; Παλμός; SOS; Αργό αναβόσβημα; Σταθερό; Στροβοσκοπικό; Άλλο
zh-CN: 灯光模式: 闪烁; 渐变; 快闪; 闪光; 关闭; 脉冲; SOS; 慢闪; 常亮; 频闪; 其他
en: Lighting mode: Blink; Fade; Fast flash; Flash; Off; Pulse; SOS; Slow flash; Steady; Strobe; Other
sk-SK: Režim osvetlenia: Blikanie; Plynulé stmievanie; Rýchle blikanie; Zábleskové blikanie; Vypnuté; Pulzovanie; SOS; Pomalé blikanie; Stále svietenie; Stroboskop; Iné
sl-SI: Način osvetlitve: Utripanje; Bledenje; Hitro utripanje; Kratko utripanje; Izklopljeno; Pulziranje; SOS; Počasno utripanje; Stalno sveti; Stroboskop; Drugo
tr: Aydınlatma modu: Yanıp sönme; Kısılma; Hızlı flaşör; Flaşör; Kapalı; Darbeli; SOS; Yavaş flaşör; Sabit; Stroboskop; Diğer
hu: Világítási mód: Villogás; Átmenet; Gyors villogás; Villanás; Ki; Pulzálás; SOS; Lassú villogás; Folyamatos; Stroboszkóp; Egyéb
ja: 照明Mode: 点滅; フェード; 高速点滅; フラッシュ; オフ; パルス; SOS; 低速点滅; 常時点灯; ストロボ; その他
fi: Valotila: Vilkku; Häivytys; Nopea välähdys; Välähdys; Pois; Pulssi; SOS; Hidas välähdys; Jatkuva; Strobovalo; Muu